North Dakota, session 69, SB2271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.5-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-24.5-01. Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Adult residential facility" means a licensed basic care facility that meets the program and
provider requirements of the Medicaid 1915(c) home and community-based services aged and
disabled waiver, specializing in the care of individuals eligible for services under a medical
assistance home and community-based waiver or similar program with chronic moderate to
severe memory loss or significant emotional, behavioral, or cognitive impairment, which
provides therapeutic, social, and recreational programming and assistance with activities of
daily living and instrumental activities of daily living.
2. "Aged" means at least sixty-five years of age.
2.3. "Blind" has the same meaning as the term has when used by the social security administration
in the supplemental security income program under titles II and XVI of the Social Security Act
[42 U.S.C. 401-434 and 42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq.].
3.4. "Congregate housing" means housing shared by two or more individuals not related to each
other which is not provided in an institution.
4.5. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
5.6. "Disabled" has the same meaning as the term has when used by the social security
administration in the supplemental security income program under titles II and XVI of the
Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 401-434 and 42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq.].
6.7. "Eligible beneficiary" means a resident of this state who:
a. (1) Is aged; or
(2) Is at least eighteen years of age and is disabled or blind;
b. (1) Has applied for and is eligible to receive and receives benefits under title XIX of the
Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.], and who has applied for and is
receiving benefits, if the individual is eligible to receive benefits, under titles II and
XVI of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 401-434 and 42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq.]; or
(2) Has applied for and is eligible to receive and receives benefits under section
50-24.1-37 for long-term services and supports pursuant to an asset test

S. B. NO. 2271 - PAGE 2
established under title XIX of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.] and
section 50-24.1-02;
c. Meets the requirements of section 23-09.3-08.1;
d. Based on a functional assessment, is not severely impaired in any of the activities of
daily living of toileting, transferring to or from a bed or chair, or eating and:
(1) Has health, welfare, or safety needs, including a need for supervision or a
structured environment; or
(2) Is impaired in three of the following four instrumental activities of daily living:
preparing meals, doing housework, taking medicine, and doing laundry; and
e. Is determined to be eligible pursuant to rules adopted by the department.
7.8. "Human service zone" means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human
services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the
department.
8.9. "Institution" means a facility licensed under chapter 23-09.3.
9.10. "Living independently" includes living in congregate housing. The term does not include living
in an institution.
10.11. "Personal needs allowance" means an amount retained by the eligible beneficiary to cover the
costs of clothing and other personal needs.
11.12. "Proprietor" means an individual responsible for day-to-day administration and management of
a facility.
12.13. "Remedial care" means services that produce the maximum reduction of an eligible
beneficiary's physical or mental disability and the restoration of an eligible beneficiary to the
beneficiary's best possible functional level.
13.14. "Would be eligible to receive the cash benefits except for income" refers to an individual
whose countable income, less the cost of necessary remedial care that may be provided
under this chapter, does not exceed an amount equal to the cash benefit under titles II
and XVI of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 401-434 and 42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq.] which the
individual would receive if the individual had no income, plus the amount allowed as the
personal needs allowance.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 50-24.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Adult residential facility payment rates - Report .
1. The department shall require an adult residential facility to submit cost reports and
supplemental information by October 31, 2025, which the department shall use to pay the
facility its current costs beginning January 1, 2026 .
2. The department shall require adult residential facilities to submit cost reports and
supplemental information by December 31, 2026, which the department shall use to provide a
rate recalculation beginning July 1, 2027 .
SECTION 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - BASIC CARE STUDY -
ASSET LIMIT - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT. The department of health and human
services shall submit a report to the legislative management by January 31, 2026, and August 31, 2026,
regarding progress on the basic care study recommendations addressing the adult residential facility

S. B. NO. 2271 - PAGE 3
and basic care payment systems, and review the asset limit for home and community-based services
aged and disabled waiver.
SECTION 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - PAYMENT MODEL
CONTINUUM RECOMMENDATIONS - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT.
1. During the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, the department of
health and human services shall make recommendations for the development of a basic care,
assisted living, and adult residential facilities payment model continuum. The
recommendations must include:
a. Appropriate methods for reimbursing property costs;
b. Options to calculate operating margin;
c. The methodology for applying annual inflationary adjustments, including whether an
independent inflation index should be utilized;
d. Rate determination for specialized basic care services provided to individuals with a
dementia-related diagnosis or head injury; and
e. A new licensing structure that includes assisted living, basic care, and adult residential
facilities.
2. The department of health and human services shall collaborate with providers and key
stakeholders to develop the recommendations.
3. The department of health and human services shall report the recommendations to the the
legislative management by August 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - ADULT
RESIDENTIAL FACILITY RATE ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,709,302, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, and from other funds derived from federal and special funds, the sum of
$1,709,302, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of health and human
services for the purpose of administering adult residential facility rates, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2271 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2271.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 5 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State